Nevada, session 83, SB385.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 360.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.750 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to this section for a partial abatement of one
or more of the taxes imposed on the:
(a) New business pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of NRS.
(b) Expanded business pursuant to chapter 361 or 363B of NRS
or a partial abatement of the local sales and use taxes imposed on
the expanded business. As used in this paragraph, “local sales and
use taxes” means the taxes imposed on the gross receipts of any
retailer from the sale of tangible personal property sold at retail, or
stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the political subdivision in
which the business is to be located or expanded, except the taxes
imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The Office of Economic Development shall approve an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The business offers primary jobs and is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director of the
Office to implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) State the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be
earlier than the date on which the Office received the application
-
*SB385*

– 3 –
and not later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves
the application;
(3) State that the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection;
(4) State that the business will offer primary jobs; [and]
(5) Incorporate a workforce development plan that provides
for the implementation by the business of a program of workforce
development for employees employed in this State by the business
that must:
(I) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit,
assess and train new employees of the business;
(II) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(III) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard; and
(6) Bind the successors in interest of the business for the
specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, 5 or 6, the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
361.0687, if the business is a new business in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more or a city whose population is 60,000
or more, the business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
-
*SB385*

– 4 –
(1) The business will have 50 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$1,000,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 361.0687, if the
business is a new business in a county whose population is less than
100,000, in an area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more
that is located within the geographic boundaries of an area that is
designated as rural by the United States Department of Agriculture
and at least 20 miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area
designated as urban by the United States Department of Agriculture,
or in a city whose population is less than 60,000, the business meets
at least one of the following requirements:
(1) The business will have 10 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$250,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(h) If the business is an existing business, the business meets at
least one of the following requirements:
(1) For a business in:
(I) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (II),
a county whose population is 100,000 or more or a city whose
population is 60,000 or more, the business will, by the eighth
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
-
*SB385*

– 5 –
which the abatement becomes effective or by twenty-five
employees, whichever is greater, who will be employed at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective; or
(II) A county whose population is less than 100,000, an
area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more that is located
within the geographic boundaries of an area that is designated as
rural by the United States Department of Agriculture and at least 20
miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area designated as
urban by the United States Department of Agriculture, or a city
whose population is less than 60,000, the business will, by the
eighth calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
which the abatement becomes effective or by six employees,
whichever is greater, who will be employed at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) The business will expand by making a capital investment
in this State, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective, in an amount equal to at
least 20 percent of the value of the tangible property possessed by
the business in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year
in which the abatement becomes effective, and the capital
investment will be in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective. The determination of the value of the tangible property
possessed by the business in the immediately preceding fiscal year
must be made by the:
(I) County assessor of the county in which the business
will expand, if the business is locally assessed; or
(II) Department, if the business is centrally assessed.
(i) The applicant has provided in the application an estimate of
the total number of new employees which the business anticipates
hiring in this State by the eighth calendar quarter following the
calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective if the
Office approves the application.
(j) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the business
will have at least 50 full-time employees on the payroll of the
business by the eighth calendar quarter following the calendar
quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, the business, by
the earlier of the eighth calendar quarter following the calendar
-
*SB385*

– 6 –
quarter in which the abatement becomes effective or the date on
which the business has at least 50 full-time employees on the payroll
of the business, has a policy for paid family and medical leave and
agrees that all employees who have been employed by the business
for at least 1 year will be eligible for at least 12 weeks of paid
family and medical leave at a rate of at least 55 percent of the
regular wage of the employee. The business will agree in writing
that if the Office approves the application, the business will not:
(1) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee from taking paid family and medical leave:
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(2) Discriminate, discipline or discharge an employee for
taking paid family and medical leave:
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(3) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee or other person from bringing a proceeding or testifying
in a proceeding against the business for a violation of the policy for
paid family and medical leave that is required pursuant to this
paragraph.
3. For purposes of paragraph (j) of subsection 2, the Office of
Economic Development shall determine that a business meets the
requirements of that paragraph if the business has a policy for paid
family and medical leave for employees on the payroll of the
business outside of this State that meets or exceeds the requirements
for a policy for paid family and medical leave pursuant to that
paragraph and the business agrees in writing that its employees on
the payroll in this State are eligible for paid family and medical
leave under such policy.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Shall not consider an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section unless the Office has requested a letter of
acknowledgment of the request for the abatement from any affected
county, school district, city or town.
(b) Shall consider the level of health care benefits provided by
the business to its employees, the policy of paid family and medical
leave provided by the business to its employees, the projected
economic impact of the business and the projected tax revenue of
-
*SB385*

– 7 –
the business after deducting projected revenue from the abated
taxes.
(c) May, if the Office determines that such action is necessary:
(1) Approve an application for a partial abatement pursuant
to this section by a business that does not meet the requirements set
forth in paragraph (f), (g) or (h) of subsection 2;
(2) Make any of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d)
to (h), inclusive, of subsection 2 more stringent; or
(3) Add additional requirements that a business must meet to
qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Office of
Economic Development shall not approve an application for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section if:
(a) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 70 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(c) The applicant intends to locate in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for locating that
business in that county.
(d) The applicant intends to expand in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for expanding
that business in that county.
(e) The applicant has changed the name or identity of the
business to evade the provisions of paragraph (c) or (d).
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the Office of
Economic Development approves an application for a partial
abatement pursuant to this section, in determining the types of taxes
imposed on a new or expanded business for which the partial
abatement will be approved and the amount of the partial abatement:
(a) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
-
*SB385*

– 8 –
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
(b) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
7. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer.
8. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant or business
meets the requirements of subsection 2 [.] , including, without
limitation, that the business is complying with the terms of the
workforce development plan.
9. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
10. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
-
*SB385*

– 9 –
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
11. The Office of Economic Development may investigate a
business whose partial abatement has been approved pursuant to
this section to determine whether the business is in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in subparagraph (5) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2. If
the Executive Director of the Office determines, based on an
investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection, that a
business has failed to substantially comply with the terms of the
workforce development plan, the business shall repay to the
Department or, if the partial abatement was from the property tax
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, to the county treasurer,
the amount of the partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to
this section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and
360.320, the business shall, in addition to the amount of the
partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this subsection,
pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial
abatement not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
12. A county treasurer:
(a) Shall deposit any money that he or she receives pursuant to
subsection 10 in one or more of the funds established by a local
government of the county pursuant to NRS 354.6113 or 354.6115;
and
(b) May use the money deposited pursuant to paragraph (a) only
for the purposes authorized by NRS 354.6113 and 354.6115.
-
*SB385*

– 10 –
[12.] 13. The Office of Economic Development may adopt
such regulations as the Office of Economic Development
determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section
and NRS 360.755.
[13.] 14. The Nevada Tax Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations regarding:
(1) The capital investment that a new business must make to
meet the requirement set forth in paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection
2; and
(2) Any security that a business is required to post to qualify
for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Nevada Tax
Commission determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section and NRS 360.755.
[14.] 15. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Office of
Economic Development may petition for judicial review in the
manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
[15.] 16. For the purposes of this section, an employee is a
“full-time employee” if he or she is in a permanent position of
employment and works an average of 30 hours per week during the
applicable period set forth in subsection 2.
Sec. 2. NRS 360.753 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.753 1. An owner of a business or a person who intends
to locate or expand a business in this State may apply to the Office
of Economic Development pursuant to this section for a partial
abatement of one or more of:
(a) The personal property taxes imposed on an aircraft and the
personal property used to own, operate, manufacture, service,
maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft; and
(b) The local sales and use taxes imposed on the purchase of
tangible personal property used to operate, manufacture, service,
maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary
and except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the Office
of Economic Development shall approve an application for a partial
abatement if the Office makes the following determinations:
(a) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
-
*SB385*

– 11 –
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the business will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is issued pursuant
to subsection 5, continue in operation in this State for a period
specified by the Office, which must be not less than 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection; [and]
(4) Incorporates a workforce development plan that
provides for the implementation by the business of a program of
workforce development for employees employed in this State by
the business that must:
(I) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit,
assess and train new employees of the business;
(II) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(III) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard; and
(5) Binds any successor in interest of the applicant for the
specified period;
(b) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtaining a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates;
(c) The business owns, operates, manufactures, services,
maintains, tests, repairs, overhauls or assembles an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft;
(d) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to
its employees in this State during the period of partial abatement is
not less than 100 percent of the average statewide hourly wage as
established by the Employment Security Division of the Department
of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal
year;
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office;
(f) If the business is:
-
*SB385*

– 12 –
(1) A new business, that it will have five or more full-time
employees on the payroll of the business within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement; or
(2) An existing business, that it will increase its number of
full-time employees on the payroll of the business in this State by 3
percent or three employees, whichever is greater, within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(g) The business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
(1) The business will make a new capital investment of at
least $250,000 in this State within 1 year after receiving its
certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(2) The business will maintain and possess in this State
tangible personal property having a value of not less than
$5,000,000 during the period of partial abatement;
(3) The business develops, refines or owns a patent or other
intellectual property, or has been issued a type certificate by the
Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 21; and
(h) If the application is for the partial abatement of the taxes
imposed by the Local School Support Tax Law, the application has
been approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
Board of Economic Development created by NRS 231.033.
3. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall approve or deny an application submitted pursuant to
this section and notify the applicant of its decision not later than 45
days after receiving the application.
(b) Must not:
(1) Consider an application for a partial abatement unless the
Office has requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for
the partial abatement from any affected county, school district, city
or town and has complied with the requirements of NRS 360.757; or
(2) Approve a partial abatement for any applicant for a
period of more than 10 years.
4. The Office of Economic Development must not approve a
partial abatement of personal property taxes for a business whose
physical property is collectively valued and centrally assessed
pursuant to NRS 361.320 and 361.3205.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
partial abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from personal property taxes, the
appropriate county treasurer.
-
*SB385*

– 13 –
6. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant or business
meets the requirements of subsection 2 [.] , including, without
limitation, that the business is complying with the terms of the
workforce development plan.
7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
8. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and whose partial abatement is in effect
ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from personal property taxes, to the appropriate
county treasurer, the amount of the partial abatement that was
allowed pursuant to this section before the failure of the business to
comply unless the Nevada Tax Commission determines that the
business has substantially complied with the requirements of this
section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320,
the business shall, in addition to the amount of the partial abatement
required to be repaid pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the
amount due at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS
99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the payment would have been
made had the partial abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
9. The Office of Economic Development may investigate a
business whose partial abatement has been approved pursuant to
this section to determine whether the business is in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in subparagraph (4) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2. If
the Executive Director of the Office determines, based on an
investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection, that a
business has failed to substantially comply with the terms of the
workforce development plan, the business shall repay to the
Department or, if the partial abatement was from the property tax
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, to the county treasurer,
-
*SB385*

– 14 –
the amount of the partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to
this section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and
360.320, the business shall, in addition to the amount of the
partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this subsection,
pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial
abatement not been approved until the date of the payment of the
tax.
10. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
[10.] 11. The Nevada Tax Commission may adopt such
regulations as the Commission determines are necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
[11.] 12. An applicant for a partial abatement who is aggrieved
by a final decision of the Office of Economic Development may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction to review the decision in
the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
[12.] 13. As used in this section:
(a) “Aircraft” means any fixed-wing, rotary-wing or unmanned
aerial vehicle.
(b) “Component of an aircraft” means any:
(1) Element that makes up the physical structure of an
aircraft, or is affixed thereto;
(2) Mechanical, electrical or other system of an aircraft,
including, without limitation, any component thereof; and
(3) Raw material or processed material, part, machinery,
tool, chemical, gas or equipment used to operate, manufacture,
service, maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or
component of an aircraft.
(c) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a permanent
position of employment and works an average of 30 hours per week
during the applicable period set forth in subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 2.
(d) “Local sales and use taxes” means any taxes imposed on the
gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal
property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in any
political subdivision of this State, except the taxes imposed by the
Sales and Use Tax Act.
(e) “Personal property taxes” means any taxes levied on
personal property by the State or a local government pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS.
-
*SB385*

– 15 –
Sec. 3. NRS 360.889 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.889 1. On behalf of a project, the lead participant in the
project may apply to the Office of Economic Development for:
(a) A certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits which
may be applied to:
(1) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(2) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(3) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(4) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3).
(b) A partial abatement of property taxes, employer excise taxes
or local sales and use taxes, or any combination of any of those
taxes.
2. For a project to be eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and the partial abatement
of the taxes described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead
participant in the project must, on behalf of the project:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 5;
(b) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that
approval of the application would promote the economic
development of this State and aid the implementation of the State
Plan for Economic Development developed by the Executive
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project collectively will make a total new capital
investment of at least $1 billion in this State within the 10-year
period immediately following approval of the application;
(d) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project are engaged in a common business
purpose or industry;
(e) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
place of business of each participant is or will be located within the
geographic boundaries of the project site or sites;
(f) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project is registered pursuant to the laws of this
State or commits to obtaining a valid business license and all other
permits required by the county, city or town in which the project
operates;
(g) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of employees engaged in the construction of the project;
(h) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of qualified employees employed or anticipated to be
employed at the project by the participants;
-
*SB385*

– 16 –
(i) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
employer engaged in the construction of the project provides a plan
of health insurance and that each employee engaged in the
construction of the project is offered coverage under the plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer;
(j) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project provides a plan of health insurance and that
each employee employed at the project by each participant is
offered coverage under the plan of health insurance provided by his
or her employer;
(k) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that at least
50 percent of the employees engaged in construction of the project
and 50 percent of the employees employed at the project are
residents of Nevada, unless waived by the Executive Director of the
Office upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of the
Office that there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents
available and qualified for such employment;
(l) Agree to provide the Office with a full compliance audit of
the participants in the project at the end of each fiscal year which:
(1) Shows the amount of money invested in this State by
each participant in the project;
(2) Shows the number of employees engaged in the
construction of the project and the number of those employees who
are residents of Nevada;
(3) Shows the number of employees employed at the project
by each participant and the number of those employees who are
residents of Nevada; and
(4) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
(m) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (l);
(n) Enter into an agreement with the Office establishing a
workforce development plan that provides for the implementation
by the participants in the project of a program of workforce
development for employees employed at the project by each
participant that must:
(1) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit, assess
and train new employees of the participants;
(2) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada System
of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(3) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard;
(o) Enter into an agreement with the governing body of the city
or county in which the qualified project is located that:
-
*SB385*

– 17 –
(1) Requires the lead participant to pay the cost of any
engineering or design work necessary to determine the cost of
infrastructure improvements required to be made by the governing
body pursuant to an economic development financing proposal
approved pursuant to NRS 360.990; and
(2) Requires the lead participant to seek reimbursement for
any costs paid by the lead participant pursuant to subparagraph (1)
from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to NRS 360.991; and
[(o)] (p) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Office.
3. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, for a project located on more than one site in this State
to be eligible for the partial abatement of the taxes described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead participant must, on behalf of
the project, submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 5 on or before June 30, 2019, and provide documentation
satisfactory to the Office that:
(a) The initial project will have a total of 500 or more full-time
employees employed at the site of the initial project and the average
hourly wage that will be paid to employees of the initial project in
this State is at least 120 percent of the average statewide hourly
wage as established by the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1
of each fiscal year;
(b) Each participant in the project must be a subsidiary or
affiliate of the lead participant; and
(c) Each participant offers primary jobs and:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
satisfies the requirements of paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.750, regardless of whether the business is a new business
or an existing business; and
(2) If a participant owns, operates, manufactures, services,
maintains, tests, repairs, overhauls or assembles an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft, that the participant satisfies the applicable
requirements of paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.753.
 If any participant is a data center, as defined in NRS 360.754, any
capital investment by that participant must not be counted in
determining whether the participants in the project collectively will
make a total new capital investment of at least $1 billion in this
State within the 10-year period immediately following approval of
the application, as required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, a project is eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 only if the Interim
Finance Committee approves a written request for the issuance of
-
*SB385*

– 18 –
the transferable tax credits. Such a request may only be submitted
by the Office and only after the Office has approved the application
submitted for the project pursuant to subsection 2. The Interim
Finance Committee may approve a request submitted pursuant to
this subsection only if the Interim Finance Committee determines
that approval of the request:
(a) Will not impede the ability of the Legislature to carry out its
duty to provide for an annual tax sufficient to defray the estimated
expenses of the State for each fiscal year as set forth in Article 9,
Section 2 of the Nevada Constitution; and
(b) Will promote the economic development of this State and
aid the implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development
developed by the Executive Director of the Office pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
5. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) A detailed description of the project, including a description
of the common purpose or business endeavor in which the
participants in the project are engaged;
(b) A detailed description of the location of the project,
including a precise description of the geographic boundaries of the
project site or sites;
(c) The name and business address of each participant in the
project, which must be an address in this State;
(d) A detailed description of the plan by which the participants
in the project intend to comply with the requirement that the
participants collectively make a total new capital investment of at
least $1 billion in this State in the 10-year period immediately
following approval of the application;
(e) If the application includes one or more partial abatements, an
agreement executed by the Office with the lead participant in the
project not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the partial abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the project will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is approved
pursuant to NRS 360.893, continue in operation in this State for a
period specified by the Office; and
(4) Binds successors in interest of the lead participant for the
specified period; and
-
*SB385*

– 19 –
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
6. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, each participant in the project must
maintain the following documents in the personnel file of the
employee:
(a) A copy of the:
(1) Current and valid Nevada driver’s license of the
employee originally issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles
more than 60 days before the hiring of the employee or a current and
valid identification card for the employee originally issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles more than 60 days before the hiring
of the employee; or
(2) If the employee is a veteran of the Armed Forces of the
United States, a current and valid Nevada driver’s license of the
employee or a current and valid identification card for the employee
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is employed full-time and scheduled
to work for an average minimum of 30 hours per week; and
(d) Proof that the employee is offered coverage under a plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer.
7. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive Director of
the Office any waiver of the requirement set forth in paragraph (k)
of subsection 2, the lead participant in the project must submit to the
Executive Director of the Office written documentation of the
efforts to meet the requirement and documented proof that an
insufficient number of Nevada residents is available and qualified
for employment.
8. The Executive Director of the Office shall make available to
the public and post on the Internet website of the Office:
(a) Any request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2; and
(b) Any approval of such a request for a waiver that is granted
by the Executive Director of the Office.
9. The Executive Director of the Office shall post a request for
a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of subsection
2 on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days after receiving
the request and shall keep the request posted on the Internet website
for not less than 5 days. The Executive Director of the Office shall
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the request.
10. The Executive Director of the Office shall consider any
comments posted on the Internet website concerning any request for
-
*SB385*

– 20 –
a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of subsection
2 before making a decision regarding whether to approve the
request. If the Executive Director of the Office approves the request
for a waiver, the Executive Director of the Office must post the
approval on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days and
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the approval.
11. If an applicant for one or more partial abatements pursuant
to this section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph
(e) of subsection 5 within 1 year after the date on which the
application was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be
approved for a partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the
applicant submits a new application.
Sec. 4. NRS 360.894 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.894 1. The lead participant in a qualified project shall,
upon the request of the Office of Economic Development, furnish
the Office with copies of all records necessary to verify that the
qualified project meets the eligibility requirements for any
transferable tax credits issued pursuant to NRS 360.891 and the
partial abatement of any taxes pursuant to NRS 360.893 [.] ,
including, without limitation, that the participants in the project
are complying with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in paragraph (n) of subsection 2 of NRS 360.889.
2. The Office may investigate a qualified project to determine
whether the participants of the qualified project are in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in paragraph (n) of subsection 2 of NRS 360.889.
3. The lead participant shall repay to the Department or the
Nevada Gaming Control Board, as applicable, any portion of the
transferable tax credits to which the lead participant is not entitled
if:
(a) The participants in the qualified project collectively fail to
make the investment in this State necessary to support the
determination by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development that the project is a qualified project;
(b) The participants in the qualified project collectively fail to
employ the number of qualified employees identified in the
certificate of eligibility approved for the qualified project;
(c) The lead participant submits any false statement,
representation or certification in any document submitted for the
purpose of obtaining transferable tax credits; or
(d) The lead participant otherwise becomes ineligible for
transferable tax credits after receiving the transferable tax credits
pursuant to NRS 360.880 to 360.896, inclusive.
-
*SB385*

– 21 –
[3.] 4. Transferable tax credits purchased in good faith are not
subject to forfeiture unless the transferee submitted fraudulent
information in connection with the purchase.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or
chapter 361 of NRS, if the lead participant in a qualified project for
which a partial abatement has been approved pursuant to NRS
360.893 and is in effect:
(a) Fails to meet the requirements for eligibility pursuant to that
section; or
(b) Ceases operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (e) of subsection 5 of NRS 360.889,
 the lead participant shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement is from the property tax imposed by chapter 361 of NRS,
to the appropriate county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed to the lead participant pursuant to NRS
360.893 before the failure of the lead participant to meet the
requirements for eligibility. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
360.232 and 360.320, the lead participant shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be repaid by the lead
participant pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount
due from the lead participant at the rate most recently established
pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the
last day of the month following the period for which the payment
would have been made had the partial abatement not been approved
until the date of payment of the tax.
[5.] 6. If the Executive Director of the Office determines,
based on an investigation conducted pursuant to subsection 2, that
the participants in a qualified project have failed to substantially
comply with the terms of the workforce development plan, the lead
participant in the qualified project shall repay to the Department,
the Nevada Gaming Control Board or the appropriate county
treasurer, as applicable, an amount of money equal to the amount
of transferable tax credits issued to the lead participant pursuant
to NRS 360.891 and the amount of the partial abatement that was
allowed to the lead participant pursuant to NRS 360.893. Except
as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the lead
participant shall, in addition to the amount of any partial
abatement required to be repaid by the lead participant pursuant
to this subsection, pay interest on the amount due from the lead
participant at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS
99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the payment would have
been made had the partial abatement not been approved until the
date of payment of the tax.
-
*SB385*

– 22 –
7. The Secretary of State may, upon application by the
Executive Director of the Office, revoke or suspend the state
business license of the lead participant in a qualified project which
is required to repay any portion of transferable tax credits pursuant
to subsection [2] 3 or the amount of any partial abatement pursuant
to subsection [4] 5 or 6 and which the Office determines is not in
compliance with the provisions of this section governing repayment.
If the state business license of the lead participant in a qualified
project is suspended or revoked pursuant to this subsection, the
Secretary of State shall provide written notice of the action to the
lead participant. The Secretary of State shall not reinstate a state
business license suspended pursuant to this subsection or issue a
new state business license to the lead participant whose state
business license has been revoked pursuant to this subsection unless
the Executive Director of the Office provides proof satisfactory
to the Secretary of State that the lead participant is in compliance
with the requirements of this section governing repayment.
Sec. 5. NRS 360.945 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.945 1. On behalf of a project, the lead participant in the
project may apply to the Office of Economic Development for:
(a) A certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits which
may be applied to:
(1) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(2) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(3) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(4) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3).
(b) An abatement of property taxes, employer excise taxes or
local sales and use taxes, or any combination of any of those taxes.
2. For a project to be eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and abatement of the
taxes described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead participant
in the project must, on behalf of the project:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 3;
(b) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that
approval of the application would promote the economic
development of this State and aid the implementation of the State
Plan for Economic Development developed by the Executive
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project collectively will make a total new capital
investment of at least $3.5 billion in this State within the 10-year
period immediately following approval of the application;
-
*SB385*

– 23 –
(d) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project are engaged in a common business
purpose or industry;
(e) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
place of business of each participant is or will be located within the
geographic boundaries of the project site;
(f) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project is registered pursuant to the laws of this
State or commits to obtaining a valid business license and all other
permits required by the county, city or town in which the project
operates;
(g) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of employees engaged in the construction of the project;
(h) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of qualified employees employed or anticipated to be
employed at the project by the participants;
(i) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
employer engaged in the construction of the project provides a plan
of health insurance and that each employee engaged in the
construction of the project is offered coverage under the plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer;
(j) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project provides a plan of health insurance and that
each employee employed at the project by each participant is
offered coverage under the plan of health insurance provided by his
or her employer;
(k) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that at least
50 percent of the employees engaged in construction of the project
and 50 percent of the employees employed at the project are
residents of Nevada, unless waived by the Executive Director of the
Office upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of the
Office that there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents
available and qualified for such employment;
(l) Agree to provide the Office with a full compliance audit of
the participants in the project at the end of each fiscal year which:
(1) Shows the amount of money invested in this State by
each participant in the project;
(2) Shows the number of employees engaged in the
construction of the project and the number of those employees who
are residents of Nevada;
(3) Shows the number of employees employed at the project
by each participant and the number of those employees who are
residents of Nevada; and
(4) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
-
*SB385*

– 24 –
(m) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (l);
(n) Enter into an agreement with the Office establishing a
workforce development plan that provides for the implementation
by the participants in the project of a program of workforce
development for employees employed at the project by each
participant that must:
(1) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit, assess
and train new employees of the participants;
(2) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada System
of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(3) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard;
(o) Enter into an agreement with the governing body of the city
or county in which the qualified project is located that:
(1) Requires the lead participant to pay the cost of any
engineering or design work necessary to determine the cost of
infrastructure improvements required to be made by the governing
body pursuant to an economic development financing proposal
approved pursuant to NRS 360.990; and
(2) Requires the lead participant to seek reimbursement for
any costs paid by the lead participant pursuant to subparagraph (1)
from the proceeds of bonds of the State of Nevada issued pursuant
to NRS 360.991; and
[(o)] (p) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Office.
3. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) A detailed description of the project, including a description
of the common purpose or business endeavor in which the
participants in the project are engaged;
(b) A detailed description of the location of the project,
including a precise description of the geographic boundaries of the
project site;
(c) The name and business address of each participant in the
project, which must be an address in this State;
(d) A detailed description of the plan by which the participants
in the project intend to comply with the requirement that the
participants collectively make a total new capital investment of at
least $3.5 billion in this State in the 10-year period immediately
following approval of the application;
(e) If the application includes one or more abatements, an
agreement executed by the Office with the lead participant in the
project not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office which:
-
*SB385*

– 25 –
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States that the project will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the abatement is approved pursuant to
NRS 360.965, continue in operation in this State for a period
specified by the Office; and
(3) Binds successors in interest of the lead participant for the
specified period; and
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
4. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, each participant in the project must
maintain the following documents in the personnel file of the
employee:
(a) A copy of the current and valid Nevada driver’s license of
the employee or a current and valid identification card for the
employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is employed full-time and scheduled
to work for an average minimum of 30 hours per week; and
(d) Proof that the employee is offered coverage under a plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer.
5. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive Director of
the Office any waiver of the requirement set forth in paragraph (k)
of subsection 2, the lead participant in the project must submit to the
Executive Director of the Office written documentation of the
efforts to meet the requirement and documented proof that an
insufficient number of Nevada residents is available and qualified
for employment.
6. The Executive Director of the Office shall make available to
the public and post on the Internet website for the Office:
(a) Any request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2; and
(b) Any approval of such a request for a waiver that is granted
by the Executive Director of the Office.
7. The Executive Director of the Office shall post a request for
a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of subsection
2 on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days after receiving
the request and shall keep the request posted on the Internet website
for not less than 5 days. The Executive Director of the Office shall
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the request.
8. The Executive Director of the Office shall consider any
comments posted on the Internet website concerning any request
for a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of
-
*SB385*

– 26 –
subsection 2 before making a decision regarding whether to approve
the request. If the Executive Director of the Office approves the
request for a waiver, the Executive Director of the Office must post
the approval on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days and
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the approval.
9. If an applicant for one or more abatements pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (e) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for
an abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant submits a
new application.
Sec. 6. NRS 360.970 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.970 1. The lead participant in a qualified project shall,
upon the request of the Office of Economic Development, furnish
the Office with copies of all records necessary to verify that the
qualified project meets the eligibility requirements for any
transferable tax credits issued pursuant to NRS 360.955 and the
abatement of any taxes pursuant to NRS 360.965 [.] , including,
without limitation, that the participants in the qualified project are
complying with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in paragraph (n) of subsection 2 of NRS 360.945.
2. The Office may investigate a qualified project to determine
whether the participants of the qualified project are in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in paragraph (n) of subsection 2 of NRS 360.945.
3. The lead participant shall repay to the Department or the
Nevada Gaming Control Board, as applicable, any portion of the
transferable tax credits to which the lead participant is not entitled
if:
(a) The participants in the qualified project collectively fail to
make the investment in this State necessary to support the
determination by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development that the project is a qualified project;
(b) The participants in the qualified project collectively fail to
employ the number of qualified employees identified in the
certificate of eligibility approved for the qualified project;
(c) The lead participant submits any false statement,
representation or certification in any document submitted for the
purpose of obtaining transferable tax credits; or
(d) The lead participant otherwise becomes ineligible for
transferable tax credits after receiving the transferable tax credits
pursuant to NRS 360.900 to 360.975, inclusive.
-
*SB385*

– 27 –
[3.] 4. Transferable tax credits purchased in good faith are not
subject to forfeiture unless the transferee submitted fraudulent
information in connection with the purchase.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or
chapter 361 of NRS, if the lead participant in a qualified project for
which an abatement has been approved pursuant to NRS 360.965
and is in effect:
(a) Fails to meet the requirements for eligibility pursuant to that
section; or
(b) Ceases operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (e) of subsection 3 of NRS 360.945,
 the lead participant shall repay to the Department or, if the
abatement is from the property tax imposed by chapter 361 of NRS,
to the appropriate county treasurer, the amount of the abatement that
was allowed to the lead participant pursuant to NRS 360.965 before
the failure of the lead participant to meet the requirements for
eligibility. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and
360.320, the lead participant shall, in addition to the amount of the
abatement required to be repaid by the lead participant pursuant to
this subsection, pay interest on the amount due from the lead
participant at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS
99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the payment would have been
made had the abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
[5.] 6. If the Executive Director of the Office determines,
based on an investigation conducted pursuant to subsection 2, that
the participants in a qualified project have failed to substantially
comply with the terms of the workforce development plan, the lead
participant in the qualified project shall repay to the Department,
the Nevada Gaming Control Board or the appropriate county
treasurer, as applicable, an amount of money equal to the amount
of transferable tax credits issued to the lead participant pursuant
to NRS 360.955 and the amount of the abatement that was allowed
to the lead participant pursuant to NRS 360.965. Except as
otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the lead
participant shall, in addition to the amount of the abatement
required to be repaid by the lead participant pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due from the lead
participant at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS
99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the payment would have
been made had the abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
-
*SB385*

– 28 –
7. The Secretary of State may, upon application by the
Executive Director of the Office, revoke or suspend the state
business license of the lead participant in a qualified project which
is required to repay any portion of transferable tax credits pursuant
to subsection [2] 3 or the amount of any abatement pursuant to
subsection [4] 5 or 6 and which the Office determines is not in
compliance with the provisions of this section governing repayment.
If the state business license of the lead participant in a qualified
project is suspended or revoked pursuant to this subsection, the
Secretary of State shall provide written notice of the action to the
lead participant. The Secretary of State shall not reinstate a state
business license suspended pursuant to this subsection or issue a
new state business license to the lead participant whose state
business license has been revoked pursuant to this subsection unless
the Executive Director of the Office provides proof satisfactory
to the Secretary of State that the lead participant is in compliance
with the requirements of this section governing repayment.
Sec. 7. NRS 372.7261 is hereby amended to read as follows:
372.7261 1. In administering the provisions of this chapter:
(a) The Department shall calculate the amount of tax imposed
on tangible personal property purchased for use in owning,
operating, manufacturing, servicing, maintaining, testing, repairing,
overhauling or assembling an aircraft or any component of an
aircraft as follows:
(1) If the tangible personal property is purchased by a
business for use in the performance of a contract, the business is
deemed the consumer of the tangible personal property and the sales
tax must be paid by the business on the sales price of the tangible
personal property to the business.
(2) If the tangible personal property is purchased by a
business for use in the performance of a contract and the sales tax is
not paid because the vendor did not have a valid seller’s permit, or
because the resale certificate was properly presented, or for any
other reason, the use tax must be imposed based on the sales price of
the tangible personal property to the business.
(b) Any tangible personal property purchased by a business for
use in the performance of a contract is deemed to have been
purchased for use in owning, operating, manufacturing, servicing,
maintaining, testing, repairing, overhauling or assembling an aircraft
or any component of an aircraft.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Aircraft” has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (a) of
subsection [12] 13 of NRS 360.753.
(b) “Component of an aircraft” has the meaning ascribed to it in
paragraph (b) of subsection [12] 13 of NRS 360.753.
-
*SB385*

– 29 –
(c) “Contract” means any contract for the ownership, operation,
manufacture, service, maintenance, testing, repair, overhaul or
assembly of an aircraft or any component of an aircraft entered into
by a business.
Sec. 8. NRS 374.7261 is hereby amended to read as follows:
374.7261 1. In administering the provisions of this chapter:
(a) The Department shall calculate the amount of tax imposed
on tangible personal property purchased for use in owning,
operating, manufacturing, servicing, maintaining, testing, repairing,
overhauling or assembling an aircraft or any component of an
aircraft as follows:
(1) If the tangible personal property is purchased by a
business for use in the performance of a contract, the business is
deemed the consumer of the tangible personal property and the sales
tax must be paid by the business on the sales price of the tangible
personal property to the business.
(2) If the tangible personal property is purchased by a
business for use in the performance of a contract and the sales tax is
not paid because the vendor did not have a valid seller’s permit, or
because the resale certificate was properly presented, or for any
other reason, the use tax must be imposed based on the sales price of
the tangible personal property to the business.
(b) Any tangible personal property purchased by a business for
use in the performance of a contract is deemed to have been
purchased for use in owning, operating, manufacturing, servicing,
maintaining, testing, repairing, overhauling or assembling an aircraft
or any component of an aircraft.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Aircraft” has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (a) of
subsection [12] 13 of NRS 360.753.
(b) “Component of an aircraft” has the meaning ascribed to it in
paragraph (b) of subsection [12] 13 of NRS 360.753.
(c) “Contract” means any contract for the ownership, operation,
manufacture, service, maintenance, testing, repair, overhaul or
assembly of an aircraft or any component of an aircraft entered into
by a business.
Sec. 9. NRS 231.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.1555 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits which may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapter 363A or 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fee imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
-
*SB385*

– 30 –
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. After considering any advice and recommendations of the
Board, the Executive Director shall establish:
(a) Procedures for applying to the Office for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits which must:
(1) Include, without limitation, a requirement that the
applicant set forth in the application:
(I) The proposed use of the transferable tax credits;
(II) The plans, projects and programs for which the
transferable tax credits will be used;
(III) The expected benefits of the issuance of the
transferable tax credits; and
(IV) A statement of the short-term and long-term impacts
of the issuance of the transferable tax credits; and
(2) Allow the applicant to revise the application upon the
recommendation of the Executive Director.
(b) The criteria which a person to whom a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits has been issued must satisfy to
be issued a certificate of transferable tax credits. In addition to any
other criteria established by the Executive Director, to be eligible
to be issued transferable tax credits pursuant to this section, the
applicant must enter into an agreement with the Office
establishing a workforce development plan that provides for the
implementation by the applicant of a program of workforce
development for employees employed by the applicant in this State
that must:
(1) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit, assess
and train new employees of the applicant;
(2) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada System
of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(3) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard.
3. After receipt of an application pursuant to this section, the
Executive Director shall review and evaluate the application and
determine whether the approval of the application would promote
the economic development of this State and aid the implementation
of the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
4. If the applicant is requesting transferable tax credits in an
amount of $100,000 or less, the Executive Director may approve the
application, subject to the provisions of subsection 6, if the
Executive Director determines that approving the application will
-
*SB385*

– 31 –
promote the economic development of this State and aid the
implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development.
5. If the applicant is requesting transferable tax credits in an
amount greater than $100,000, the Executive Director shall submit
the application and the Executive Director’s review and evaluation
of the application pursuant to subsection 3 to the Board, and the
Board may approve the application, subject to the provisions of
subsection 6, if the Board determines that approving the application
will promote the economic development of this State and aid the
implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development.
6. The Executive Director or the Board shall not approve any
application for transferable tax credits for:
(a) A period of more than 5 fiscal years;
(b) Fiscal Year 2015-2016; or
(c) Any fiscal year if the approval of the application would
cause the total amount of transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
this section to exceed:
(1) For Fiscal Year 2016-2017, $1,000,000.
(2) For Fiscal Year 2017-2018, $2,000,000.
(3) For Fiscal Year 2018-2019, $2,000,000.
(4) For Fiscal Year 2019-2020, $3,000,000.
(5) For a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2020,
$5,000,000.
7. If the Executive Director or the Board approves an
application and issues a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits, the Office shall immediately forward a copy of the
certificate of eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the
tax credits available pursuant to this section to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department of Taxation; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
8. Within 14 days after the Office determines that a person to
whom a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits has been
issued satisfies the criteria established by the Executive Director
pursuant to subsection 2, the Office shall notify the person that
transferable tax credits will be issued. Within 30 days after the
receipt of the notice, the person shall make an irrevocable
declaration of the amount of transferable tax credits that will be
applied to each fee or tax set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of
subsection 1, thereby accounting for all of the credits which will be
issued. Upon receipt of the declaration, the Office shall issue to the
person a certificate of transferable tax credits in the amount
approved by the Executive Director or the Board, as applicable, for
the fees or taxes included in the declaration. The Office shall notify
the Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming Control Board
-
*SB385*

– 32 –
of all transferable tax credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1, and the
amount of any transferable tax credits transferred.
9. The Office may investigate a person that is issued
transferable tax credits pursuant to this section to determine
whether the person is in substantial compliance with the terms of
the workforce development plan described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2. If the Executive Director determines, based on an
investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection, that a person
has failed to substantially comply with the terms of the workforce
development plan, the person shall repay to the Department or the
Nevada Gaming Control Board, as applicable, an amount of
money equal to the amount of transferable tax credits issued to the
person pursuant to this section.
Sec. 10. NRS 274.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
274.310 1. A person who intends to locate a business in this
State within:
(a) A historically underutilized business zone, as defined in 15
U.S.C. § 632;
(b) A redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of
NRS;
(c) An area eligible for a community development block grant
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570; or
(d) An enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R.
Part 597,
 may submit a request to the governing body of the county, city or
town in which the business would operate for an endorsement of an
application by the person to the Office of Economic Development
for a partial abatement of one or more of the taxes imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS or the local sales and use taxes. The
governing body of the county, city or town shall provide notice of
the request to the board of trustees of the school district in which the
business would operate. The notice must set forth the date, time and
location of the hearing at which the governing body will consider
whether to endorse the application. As used in this subsection,
“local sales and use taxes” means the taxes imposed on the gross
receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal property
sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the political
subdivision in which the business is located, except the taxes
imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The governing body of a county, city or town shall develop
procedures for:
(a) Evaluating whether such an abatement would be beneficial
for the economic development of the county, city or town.
-
*SB385*

– 33 –
(b) Issuing a certificate of endorsement for an application for
such an abatement that is found to be beneficial for the economic
development of the county, city or town.
3. A person whose application has been endorsed by the
governing body of the county, city or town, as applicable, pursuant
to this section may submit the application to the Office of Economic
Development. The Office shall approve the application if the Office
makes the following determinations:
(a) The business is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Administrator pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Administrator to
implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which : [states:]
(1) [The] States the date on which the abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application; [and]
(2) [That] States that the business will, after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective:
(I) Commence operation and continue in operation in the
historically underutilized business zone, as defined in 15 U.S.C. §
632, redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of NRS,
area eligible for a community development block grant pursuant to
24 C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community established pursuant to
24 C.F.R. Part 597 for a period specified by the Office, which must
be at least 5 years; and
(II) Continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth
in this subsection [.] ; and
(3) Incorporates a workforce development plan that
provides for the implementation by the business of a program of
workforce development for employees employed by the business in
this State that must:
(I) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit,
assess and train new employees of the business;
(II) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(III) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard.
-
*SB385*

– 34 –
 The agreement must bind successors in interest of the business
for the specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business will operate.
(d) The applicant invested or commits to invest a minimum of
$500,000 in capital assets that will be retained at the location of the
business in the historically underutilized business zone, as defined
in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter
279 of NRS, area eligible for a community development block grant
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community established
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 597 until at least the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
4. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement, the Office shall immediately
forward a certificate of eligibility for the abatement to:
(a) The Department of Taxation;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer of the county
in which the business will be located.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section:
(a) The partial abatement must be for a duration of not less than
1 year but not more than 5 years.
(b) If the abatement is from the property tax imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS, the partial abatement must not exceed 75
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by a business each
year pursuant to that chapter.
6. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new request pursuant to subsection 1.
7. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the eligibility requirements for the partial
abatement; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
 the business shall repay to the Department of Taxation or, if the
partial abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the
-
*SB385*

– 35 –
partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before
the failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
8. The Office of Economic Development may investigate a
business whose partial abatement is approved pursuant to this
section to determine whether the business is in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 3. If
the Executive Director of the Office determines, based on an
investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection, that a
business has failed to substantially comply with the terms of the
workforce development plan, the business shall repay to the
Department of Taxation or, if the partial abatement was from
the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, to the
county treasurer, the amount of the partial abatement that was
allowed to the business pursuant to this section. Except as
otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business
shall, in addition to the amount of the partial abatement required
to be paid pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount
due at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040
for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the month
following the period for which the payment would have been made
had the partial abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
9. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary or advisable to
carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. An applicant for an abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 11. NRS 274.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
274.320 1. A person who intends to expand a business in this
State within:
(a) A historically underutilized business zone, as defined in 15
U.S.C. § 632;
(b) A redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of
NRS;
-
*SB385*

– 36 –
(c) An area eligible for a community development block grant
pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570; or
(d) An enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R.
Part 597,
 may submit a request to the governing body of the county, city or
town in which the business operates for an endorsement of an
application by the person to the Office of Economic Development
for a partial abatement of the local sales and use taxes imposed on
capital equipment. The governing body of the county, city or town
shall provide notice of the request to the board of trustees of the
school district in which the business operates. The notice must set
forth the date, time and location of the hearing at which the
governing body will consider whether to endorse the application. As
used in this subsection, “local sales and use taxes” means the taxes
imposed on the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of
tangible personal property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise
consumed, in the political subdivision in which the business is
located, except the taxes imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and
the Local School Support Tax Law.
2. The governing body of a county, city or town shall develop
procedures for:
(a) Evaluating whether such an abatement would be beneficial
for the economic development of the county, city or town.
(b) Issuing a certificate of endorsement for an application for
such an abatement that is found to be beneficial for the economic
development of the county, city or town.
3. A person whose application has been endorsed by the
governing body of the county, city or town, as applicable, pursuant
to this section may submit the application to the Office of Economic
Development. The Office shall approve the application if the Office
makes the following determinations:
(a) The business is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Administrator pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Administrator to
implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which : [states:]
(1) [The] States the date on which the abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application; [and]
-
*SB385*

– 37 –
(2) [That] States that the business will, after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective:
(I) Continue in operation in the historically underutilized
business zone, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area
created pursuant to chapter 279 of NRS, area eligible for a
community development block grant pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570
or enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 597
for a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years;
and
(II) Continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth
in this subsection [.] ; and
(3) Incorporates a workforce development plan that
provides for the implementation by the business of a program of
workforce development for employees employed by the business in
this State that must:
(I) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit,
assess and train new employees of the business;
(II) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(III) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard.
 The agreement must bind successors in interest of the business
for the specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) The applicant invested or commits to invest a minimum of
$250,000 in capital equipment that will be retained at the location of
the business in the historically underutilized business zone, as
defined in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area created pursuant to
chapter 279 of NRS, area eligible for a community development
block grant pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community
established pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 597 until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
4. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement, the Office shall immediately
forward a certificate of eligibility for the abatement to:
(a) The Department of Taxation; and
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section:
-
*SB385*

– 38 –
(a) The partial abatement must be for a duration of not less than
1 year but not more than 5 years.
(b) If the abatement is from the property tax imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS, the partial abatement must not exceed 75
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by a business each
year pursuant to that chapter.
6. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new request pursuant to subsection 1.
7. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the eligibility requirements for the partial
abatement; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
 the business shall repay to the Department of Taxation the
amount of the partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to this
section before the failure of the business to comply unless the
Nevada Tax Commission determines that the business has
substantially complied with the requirements of this section. Except
as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business
shall, in addition to the amount of the partial abatement required to
be paid pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount due
at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for
each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the month
following the period for which the payment would have been made
had the partial abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
8. The Office of Economic Development may investigate a
business whose partial abatement is approved pursuant to this
section to determine whether the business is in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 3. If
the Executive Director of the Office determines, based on an
investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection, that a
business has failed to substantially comply with the terms of the
workforce development plan, the business shall repay to the
Department of Taxation the amount of the partial abatement that
was allowed pursuant to this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to
this subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most
-
*SB385*

– 39 –
recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or
portion thereof, from the last day of the month following the
period for which the payment would have been made had the
partial abatement not been approved until the date of payment of
the tax.
9. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary or advisable to
carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. An applicant for an abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 12. NRS 274.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
274.330 1. A person who owns a business which is located
within an enterprise community established pursuant to 24 C.F.R.
Part 597 in this State may submit a request to the governing body of
the county, city or town in which the business is located for an
endorsement of an application by the person to the Office of
Economic Development for a partial abatement of one or more of
the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS or the local sales
and use taxes. The governing body of the county, city or town shall
provide notice of the request to the board of trustees of the school
district in which the business operates. The notice must set forth the
date, time and location of the hearing at which the governing body
will consider whether to endorse the application. As used in this
subsection, “local sales and use taxes” means the taxes imposed on
the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal
property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the
political subdivision in which the business is located, except the
taxes imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The governing body of a county, city or town shall develop
procedures for:
(a) Evaluating whether such an abatement would be beneficial
for the economic development of the county, city or town.
(b) Issuing a certificate of endorsement for an application for
such an abatement that is found to be beneficial for the economic
development of the county, city or town.
3. A person whose application has been endorsed by the
governing body of the county, city or town, as applicable, pursuant
to this section may submit the application to the Office of Economic
Development. The Office shall approve the application if the Office
makes the following determinations:
(a) The business is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Administrator pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
-
*SB385*

– 40 –
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Administrator to
implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which : [states:]
(1) [The] States the date on which the abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application; [and]
(2) [That] States that the business will, after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective:
(I) Continue in operation in the enterprise community for
a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years; and
(II) Continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth
in this subsection [.] ; and
(3) Incorporates a workforce development plan that
provides for the implementation by the business of a program of
workforce development for employees employed by the business in
this State that must:
(I) Train incumbent employees or be used to recruit,
assess and train new employees of the business;
(II) Be provided by an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education, a private postsecondary educational
institution, a school district or a charter school; and
(III) If completed, result in a postsecondary or industry-
recognized credential, or an identifiable occupational skill that
meets the applicable industry standard.
 The agreement must bind successors in interest of the business
for the specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) The business:
(1) Employs one or more dislocated workers who reside in
the enterprise community; and
(2) Pays such employees a wage of not less than 100 percent
of the federally designated level signifying poverty for a family of
four persons and provides medical benefits to the employees and
their dependents which meet the minimum requirements for medical
benefits established by the Office.
4. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement, the Office shall:
-
*SB385*

– 41 –
(a) Determine the percentage of employees of the business
which meet the requirements of paragraph (d) of subsection 3 and
grant a partial abatement equal to that percentage; and
(b) Immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(1) The Department of Taxation;
(2) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(3) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer of the county
in which the business is located.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section:
(a) The partial abatement must be for a duration of not less than
1 year but not more than 5 years.
(b) If the abatement is from the property tax imposed pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS, the partial abatement must not exceed 75
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by a business each
year pursuant to that chapter.
6. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new request pursuant to subsection 1.
7. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the eligibility requirements for the partial
abatement; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
 the business shall repay to the Department of Taxation or, if the
partial abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the
partial abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before
the failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
-
*SB385*

– 42 –
8. The Office of Economic Development may investigate a
business whose partial abatement is approved pursuant to this
section to determine whether the business is in substantial
compliance with the terms of the workforce development plan
described in subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 3. If
the Executive Director of the Office determines, based on an
investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection, that a
business has failed to substantially comply with the terms of the
workforce development plan, the business shall repay to the
Department of Taxation or, if the partial abatement was from
the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, to the
county treasurer, the amount of the partial abatement that was
allowed pursuant to this section. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to
this subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most
recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or
portion thereof, from the last day of the month following the
period for which the payment would have been made had the
partial abatement not been approved until the date of payment of
the tax.
9. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall adopt regulations relating to the minimum level of
benefits that a business must provide to its employees to qualify for
an abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Office determines to
be necessary or advisable to carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. An applicant for an abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
for judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
[10.] 11. As used in this section, “dislocated worker” means a
person who:
(a) Has been terminated, laid off or received notice of
termination or layoff from employment;
(b) Is eligible for or receiving or has exhausted his or her
entitlement to unemployment compensation;
(c) Has been dependent on the income of another family
member but is no longer supported by that income;
(d) Has been self-employed but is no longer receiving an income
from self-employment because of general economic conditions in
the community or natural disaster; or
(e) Is currently unemployed and unable to return to a previous
industry or occupation.
-
*SB385*

– 43 –
Sec. 13. The amendatory provisions of this act apply only to
an application for transferable tax credits or an abatement from
taxation for which a person applies on or after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 14. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 13, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 3 and 4 of this act expire by limitation on June 30,
2032.
4. Sections 2, 7 and 8 of this act expire by limitation on
June 30, 2035.
5. Sections 5 and 6 of this act expire by limitation on June 30,
2036.
H
-
*SB385*